Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4112.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 11, chapter 632, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 11. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described in section 2 (3), chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2017 (Ballot Measure 99 (2016)), as amended by section 23, chapter 57, Oregon Laws
2019, for a percentage-based transfer of moneys with an annual cap, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, the amount allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the
Outdoor School Education Fund is [$48,060,583] $54,060,583.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 16